inc/noun_affixes.lexc
LEXICON NOUN_DEP_NONKINSHIP_STEMS
! Animate Dependent Noun stems
masakay:asakay NAD "skin" ;
mitâs:tâs NAD "pair of pants" ; ! AEW NDA-1 (Consonant initial regular stem)
môhpan:ohpan NAD "lung" ; ! AEW NDA-1 (Vowel initial regular stem) note that in 3rd person the w- does not surface
mitihtikosiy:tihtikosiy NAD "kidney" ; ! AEW NDA-2 (Consonant initial regular VG stem) N.B. also occurs as the stems tihtikosiw and tihtikos (the latter is an NDI-1 declension)
maskasiy:askasiy NAD "finger nail/claw" ; ! AEW NDA-2 (Vowel Initial VG stem) 
! Inanimate Dependent Noun stems
mihtawakay:htawakay NID "ear" ;
mispiton:spiton NID "arm" ;
miyaw:iyaw2 NID ;
mitêh:têh NID "heart" ; ! AEW NDI-1 (Consonant Initial Regular stem)
mîpit:îpit NID "tooth" ; ! AEW NDI-1 (Vowel Initial Regular stem)
miskotâkay:skotâkay NID "coat/dress" ; ! AEW NDI-2 (Consonant Initial VW stem)
mêstakay:êstakay NID "hair" ; ! AEW NDI-1 (Vowel Initial VW stem)
miskîsik:skîsikw NID "eye" ; ! AEW NDI-3 (Consonant Initial Cw stem)
mayakask:ayakaskw NID "palate" ; ! AEW NDI-3 (Vowel Initial Cw stem)
mîwas:îwat3 NID "sacred bundle" ; ! AEW NID Irregular(?) VW single-syllable stem. N.B. T->s when word final.
mîki:îk NID_SG/I "home" ; ! AEW NDI-4 (Vowel Initial Single Syllable NDI-4 stem) N.B. Doesn't usually work unpossessed or plural unless distributive.
@P.number.SG@mîni:@P.number.SG@în NID_SG/I "bone-marrow" ; ! AEW NDI-4 (Vowel Initial Single Syllable NDI-4 stem) N.B. might cause issue with <î>, also is a mass noun that is never plural.

LEXICON NOUN_DEP_KINSHIP_STEMS
-ohkom:ohkom NAD "grand-mother" ;
-ôhtawiy:ôhtawiy NAD "father" ;
-tânis:tânis NAD "daughter, brother, sister" ;
-nîkihik:nîkihikw NAD "parent" ; ! AEW NDA-3 (Consonant initial Vw stem) Deal later: can also be the stem <wiyihkw> or <iyihkw>. <wiyihkw> and <iyihkw> can occur in locative. The <nîkihik> can not.
-îtim:îtimw NAD "cross-cousin of opposite gender" ; ! AEW NDA-3 (Cowel initial Vw stem).
-îw:îw2 NAD_SG/A "wife" ; ! AEW NDA-4 (Vowel initial sing syllable NDA-4 stem). N.B. Only one of its type.
@P.loc.NULL@-îskw:@P.loc.NULL@îskw NAD_SG/A "fellow wife; husband's ex" ; ! AEW NDA-4w (Vowel initial single-syllable-/w/ stem). N.B. Only one of its type. Cannot take the locative (marked here with a flag-diacritic, which could be incorporated in a new set of NON-LOC contlexes).

LEXICON NOUN_INDEP_STEMS
!
! Independent NA AEW to FST conversion
! NA-1, NA-2 -> NA
! NA-3 -> NA + stem-final -w
! NA-4, NA-4w -> NA_SG/A_POSS/IM -w2, y4 (immutable)
!
! Independent NI AEW to FST conversion
! NI-1, NI-2 -> NI
! NI-3 -> NI + -w (stem)
! NI-4, NI-4w -> NI_SG/I_POSS/IM, with w2, y4 for the immutable final glides
!
! Animate Noun stems
pahkwêsikan NA_POSS/IM "bannock" ; ! AEW NA-1 (Consonant-Initial Regular NA Stem)
asikan NA "sock" ; ! AEW NA-1 (Vowel-Initial Regular NA Stem)
kihc-ôkiniy NA "tomato" ; ! AEW NA-2 (Consonant-Initial Vowel-Glide NA Stem)
ayapiy NA "net" ; ! AEW NA-2 (Vowel-Initial Vowel-Glide NA Stem)
masinahikanâhtik:masinahikanâhtikw NA "pencil" ; ! AEW NA-3 (Consonant-Initial Consonant-/w/ NA Stem)
askihk:askihkw NA_POSS/IM "kettle, pail" ; ! AEW NA-3 (Vowel-Initial Consonant-/w/ NA Stem)
niska:nisk NA_SG/A_POSS/IM "goose" ; ! AEW NA-4 (Consonant-Initial Single-Syllable NA Stem)
sihta:siht NA_SG/A_POSS/IM "spruce" ; ! AEW NA-4 (Consonant-Initial Single-Syllable NA Stem)
êsa:ês NA_SG/A_POSS/IM "clam; shell" ; ! AEW NA-4 (Vowel-Initial Single-Syllable NA Stem)
wâhkwa:wâhkw NA_SG/A_POSS/IM "roe, fish eggs; lump of roe" ; ! AEW NA-4w (Consonant-Initial Single-Syllable-/w/ NA Stem)
ihkwa:ihkw NA_SG/A_POSS/IM "louse" ; ! AEW NA-4w (Vowel-Initial Single-Syllable-/w/ NA Stem)
! Non-AEW NA test cases
âmow NA_POSS/IM "bee" ;
maskwa:maskw NA_SG/A_POSS/IM "bear" ;
sîsîp NA_POSS/IM "duck" ;
! Inanimate Noun stems
askiy NI "land" ;
cîman NA "canoe" ; ! AEW NI-1 (Consonant-Initial Regular NI Stem)
astotin NI "hat" ; ! AEW NI-1 (Vowel-Initial Regular NI Stem)
mîkisasâkay NI "beaded coat, beaded dress" ; ! AEW NI-2 (Consonant-Initial VW NI Stem)
oskasâkay NI "new coat, new dress" ; ! AEW NI-2 (Vowel-Initial VW NI Stem)
pahkêkin:pahkêkinw NI "leather, rawhide" ; ! AEW NI-3 (Consonant-Initial Cw NI Stem)
askekin:askêkinw NI "fresh rawhide" ; ! AEW NI-3 (Vowel-Initial Cw NI Stem)
wâwi:wâw2 NI_SG/I_POSS/IM "egg" ; ! AEW NI-4 (Consonant-Initial Single-Syllable NI Stem)
osk-âyi:osk-ây4 NI_SG/I_POSS/IM "new item, new thing" ; ! AEW NI-4 (Vowel-Initial Single-Syllable NI Stem)
mihko:mihkw NI_SG/I_POSS/IM "blood" ; ! AEW NI-4w (Consonant-Initial Single-Syllable-/w/ NI Stem)
! Remaining example stem cases
! atimw ! Suppletively irregular NA
! ôsi ! AEW NI-4 (Vowel-Initial Single-Syllable irregular NI Stem)
! Subset of lexicalized Diminutive Animate Independent stems
@P.dim.DIM@ NOUN_INDEP_DIM_STEMS ;

! Sub-continuation lexicon for lexicalized diminutive stems
LEXICON NOUN_INDEP_DIM_STEMS
acimos NA "puppy" ; !

! Case-specific continuation lexica for -im/0 and -is/-isis

LEXICON NA_SG/A_POSS/IM
@U.sg.A@ NA_POSS/IM ;

LEXICON NA_POSS/IM
@P.poss.IM@ NA ;

LEXICON NA_DIM/IS
@P.is.IS@ NA ;

LEXICON NA_DIM/ISIS
@P.isis.ISIS@ NA ;

LEXICON NA_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@P.poss.IM@@P.is.IS@ NA ;

LEXICON NA_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS
@P.poss.IM@@P.isis.ISIS@ NA ;

! NI

LEXICON NI_SG/I_POSS/IM
@U.sg.I@ NI_POSS/IM ;

LEXICON NI_POSS/IM
@P.poss.IM@ NI ;

LEXICON NI_DIM/IS
@P.is.IS@ NI ;

LEXICON NI_DIM/ISIS
@P.isis.ISIS@ NI ;

LEXICON NI_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@P.poss.IM@@P.is.IS@ NI ;

LEXICON NI_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS
@P.poss.IM@@P.isis.ISIS@ NI ;

! NAD 

LEXICON NAD_SG/A
@U.sg.A@ NAD ;

LEXICON NAD_POSS/IM
@P.poss.IM@ NAD ;

LEXICON NAD_DIM/IS
@P.is.IS@ NAD ;

LEXICON NAD_DIM/ISIS
@P.isis.ISIS@ NAD ;

LEXICON NAD_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@P.poss.IM@@P.IS.is@ NAD ;

LEXICON NAD_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS
@P.poss.IM@@P.isis.ISIS@ NAD ;

! NID

LEXICON NID_SG/I
@U.sg.I@ NID ;

LEXICON NID_POSS/IM
@P.poss.IM@ NID ;

LEXICON NID_DIM/IS
@P.is.IS@ NID ;

LEXICON NID_DIM/ISIS
@P.isis.ISIS@ NID ;

LEXICON NID_POSS/IM_DIM/IS
@P.poss.IM@@P.is.IS@ NID ;

LEXICON NID_POSS/IM_DIM/ISIS
@P.poss.IM@@P.isis.ISIS@ NID ;

!! ENDLEX for wrapping up various things

LEXICON ENDLEX
! Adding diminutive trigger to lexicalized diminutives to palatalize potential poss. person prefixes
@R.dim.DIM@:@R.dim.DIM@%^DIM # ;
@D.dim@ # ;
